Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2482
Sections, how construed.

The provisions of sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative, and complete method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to, and not in derogation of, powers conferred upon municipalities, agencies, and others by law. Insofar as the provisions of sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, administrative order, or regulation, the provisions of sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall be controlling.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 82.